District of Columbia statutes.
4-1703.01

ATJ; funding and administration.

(a)

The Deputy Mayor shall award a grant each fiscal year from the budget of the Initiative to the Bar Foundation for the purpose of the Bar Foundation providing support to nonprofit organizations that deliver civil legal services to low-income and under-served District residents, including funds for a shared legal interpreter bank. Payment of the award shall be submitted by October 15th of each fiscal year in the amount specified in an act of the Council. The grant shall equal the budget for ATJ.

(b)

(1)

The Deputy Mayor shall permit the Bar Foundation to use up to 5% of the grant awarded in each fiscal year for reasonable administrative expenses, including audits, associated with the provision of support to the nonprofit organizations.

(2)

Any training or evaluation deemed necessary by the Bar Foundation for purposes of the Initiative shall be permitted as a non-administrative expense, with reasonable expenses for these purposes not restricted to the percentage set aside for administrative expenses under paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 301
as added Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 3002(b), 58 DCR 6226
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 3032(b), 61 DCR 9990
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3032(b) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added (b)(2).
This section is referenced in § 4-1702.02.